Utah statutes.
70C-6-105.   Maximum charge by creditor for insurance.

If a creditor contracts for or receives a separate charge for insurance, the amount charged the debtor for the insurance may not exceed the premium to be charged by the insurer, without deduction for commissions, as computed at the time the charge to the debtor is determined, conforming to any rate filings required by law and made by the insurer with the commissioner of insurance.

